Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF785.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 11, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 11. A majority of the membership of each charter schoolâs governing board shall be residents of the geographic area served by the charter school. Each member of the governing board who is not a resident of the geographic area served by House File 785, p. 2 the charter school must be a resident of this state must be a citizen of the United States . Not more than one member of the governing board may be a resident of another state. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 785, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor